Utah statutes.
26-18-3.8.   Utah's Premium Partnership For Health Insurance -- Eligibility expansion.

The department shall seek federal approval of an amendment to the state's Utah Premium Partnership for Health Insurance program to adjust the eligibility determination for single adults and parents who have an offer of employer sponsored insurance.  The amendment shall:

(1)  be within existing appropriations for the Utah Premium Partnership for Health Insurance program; and

(2)  provide that adults who are up to 200% of the federal poverty level are eligible for premium subsidies in the Utah Premium Partnership for Health Insurance program.

